Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-325
Commission; funds; how expended.

All funds expended by the commission shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants drawn by the Director of Administrative Services on vouchers signed by the secretary. No such vouchers shall be issued except upon accounts authorized by the commission in open meeting, except that vouchers for mileage or other traveling expense shall be allowed as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. The commission shall at the first regular meeting audit all expenditures made since its last regular meeting.

Laws 1929, c. 113, § 12, p. 447;

C.S.1929, § 81-6512;

Laws 1935, c. 174, § 9, p. 644;

Laws 1941, c. 180, § 8, p. 705;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-6512;

R.S.1943, § 81-814;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 174;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-814;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 83.